demo/src/test/resources/hyph_en_CA.dic
UTF-8
% ADOBE CONFIDENTIAL
% ___________________
%
%  Copyright ©2011 Adobe Systems Incorporated
%  All Rights Reserved.
%
% NOTICE:  All information contained herein is, and remains
% the property of Adobe Systems Incorporated and its suppliers,
% if any.  The intellectual and technical concepts contained
% herein are proprietary to Adobe Systems Incorporated and its
% suppliers and are protected by trade secret or copyright law.
% Dissemination of this information or reproduction of this material
% is strictly forbidden unless prior written permission is obtained
% from Adobe Systems Incorporated.
%
% Version 1.0.1
%
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
COMPOUNDLEFTHYPHENMIN 2
COMPOUNDRIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
NOHYPHEN -,',’
1-1
1'1
1’1
1's./'=s,1,2
1't./'=t,1,2
1’s./’=s,1,2
1’t./’=t,1,2
NEXTLEVEL
.a2
.aer1ob3i
.ael1
.ad3a2ms
.ade2
.adel3i
.ad2d3ed
.ad1de
.ad2d3in
.ad1di
.1a2d1v
.ado3le
.adopt3ed
.1adop
.ad2ma
.ad1m2
.ad2me
.ad3mis4si3bi
.admis1si
.ad1j
.ad1ja1
.a2sh2es
.as2sad
.4assa
.as1se
.as2set
.as1su
.asso3c
.as1so
.as1si
.ask1i
.a4s1c
.as3tar
.as4tron
.as3t2i.
.as1q
.ar3a2nd
.ara3bia
.ar3a2m.
.ar3e2a.
.ar1et
.ar1ra
.ar1re
.ar1ki
.aro3mati
.arbi1
.ar2c1i
.ar2c1t
.ar3thu
.art3ier
.arti3sa2n.
.art2isa
.art3is1ti
.ar4ti3cl
.ar3tic2
.ar1li
.ar3mie
.arm3ing
.ar3m2y.
.ary1
.ar1q
.avar1
.avail3i
.avert3i
.a4vert
.avow3i
.1avow
.au3e
.2audi3bi
.aud3i2t.
.audit4
.aud3its
.aus1
.aur3all
.aur2a
.aure4
.aur3ea
.au3th
.aut4i
.aug1e
.an3aly3ses
.an3a4ly1sis
.ana3lyz
.an3er
.an3dan
.a2nd
.an3de
.an1do
.an2v
.an1ka
.an3n2a.
.an3nas
.an3nu1a
.an1ce
.anil1
.ani3mat
.an3t2i.
.anti3m
.2an1ge
.an3gl2e.
.an3gle2s.
.abas3es
.aca3demic
.acade4
.ach2
.achi2
.ach3ine
.ach3in2g.
.ach1ing
.ace3ti
.ac3r2o.
.acr2
.ac3i2d.
.act1e
.a2ct
.actu3al1it
.ac1tu
.ac1to
.ac3ti2v2e.
.ac3tiven
.act3ivel
.ac3tivi
.ac4tio
.act3ing
.ac1q
.aid3ed
.air1i
.ai1o
.ain1t
.ai1la
.ail1i
.aig1
.af1f
.af3te2r.
.afte2
.ath3ens
.2athe
.atel1
.aton3i
.2aton
.at1ol
.2atom1
.at3o2m.
.at1t
.at2ma
.at1m
.al1di
.al1ve
.alo2m
.al1c
.al2i
.al3ina
.ali3ci
.align3i
.ali1p
.al3te2r.
.alte2
.al3t2ere
.al3ter3i
.al2lah
.al1la
.al1le
.al3loc
.al3loy
.allian3ces
.al1li1a
.alp1i
.ag3ate
.ag3e2r.
.ag3ers
.ag1on
.ag3ing
.am3ari
.ama3t
.am1et
.amor3p
.am3be2r.
.a2mb
.am3bie
.am3bit
.am3biguo
.am3ble
.ambl2
.am4b2l2e.
.am2ma
.ay2a
.aw4f
.aph2
.apt1e
.ap1ti
.apt2l
.ap1pe
.ap1po
.appoin4t3ed
.4appointe
.ap3pli
.ap3p2lyi
.apply1
.aq3uila
.axi3al1l
.ax2in
.axil1
.h2
.hast3en4
.har3di
.har3pie
.ha3ve2n.
.haul3in
.hau2l
.hand3ie
.ha2nd
.hand3in
.han3dl2e.
.hang3er
.h2ange
.hang3ing
.hab3i2t.
.habi3t3an
.habi3tat
.hab3its
.ha3bil
.hal4e
.hal1d
.hay1i
.hawk3in4g
.1hawk
.haw1i
.head3ed
.1head
.heart4ed
.heart1e
.heat3e
.health3i1
.he2s
.herd3e
.herd3i
.he3r2o.
.her3on
.he2n1d
.he3li3u
.he2m
.hew1i
.he2w
.hunt3e
.hu2l
.hu3ma2n.
.hu3mane
.hu3mans
.hu2m1b
.hu3midi
.humid3i4f2y.
.humidi3f
.humidify1
.ho3r2a.
.hors3e2s.
.hor3ta
.hor3t3e
.hov3e2r.
.hov3ers
.hok2i
.hous3es
.hoo3si2
.hook3i
.hon3e2y.
.hon3or2ed
.hon3ou
.hon3in2
.ho2l
.hol3ie
.hol3in
.hia1
.his3ta
.his3tor
.hi2sto
.hin3gi
.h1ing
.hick3e
.hil1a
.hill3e2r.
.hy3dra
.hydr2
.hy3drou
.hy3drog
.e2
.eas4e
.eas1i
.east3er1l
.ear3li
.ea1k2
.eat3er4
.edac1
.edu3ci
.edi3bi
.ed3i2t.
.edi3ti
.esh1
.ess4
.es3ser
.esse2
.3es3sent
.esse2n
.es1si
.es1k
.e4s1c
.es1ia
.es1t
.es2tan
.es2tes
.es2tos
.4esto
.es1pe
.es1pr
.es1q
.er2a
.erad3icab
.erec4
.ere1m
.4er2s1k
.er2r1i
.erot3i2c.
.er1o2g
.er3ne2s4t.
.er2ica
.evo2c
.evil3l4
.evi2l
.eu1d
.eu3ros
.eu1g
.eu1p
.eo2
.en1a
.en2e
.en2d3e2d
.ende4
.e2nd
.en3der
.en4d3in
.en1s
.enun3
.en1c
.en1it
.ent4
.en3ta
.entan3gl2e.
.en1th
.en1te
.en3tr2e.
.en1ti
.en1gi
.en1z2
.eb2
.eb1b1i
.e2bb
.eck1
.eco3nom3ic
.ect3or
.e2ct
.ef1
.etha3no
.eth3an
.eth3ica
.eth3i2cs
.e2ti1q
.elam1
.elec3to
.ele2ct
.el2so
.elon1
.elop3i
.el2i
.el3ian
.elici2
.elicit3a
.eligi3b2i
.eli1gib
.el2f1
.eg1g3er
.eg2g1i
.ema1l
.emi1n
.em3m
.em1ph
.em1pe
.emp1r
.empow3ere
.em1po
.em1pl
.ey1er
.ey1i
.ew1i
.ej4ect3e
.eje2ct
.eject3in
.episco3pal1
.epis1c
.epis1copa
.ex3ac2t.
.exa2ct
.ex1es
.ex3ercis2e.
.exer1c
.exer1ci
.ex3er2t.
.ex3erte
.ex3erts
.exist3en4t.
.exis2
.1ex1p
.expos3u
.d2
.dar3ing
.daub3i
.1dau
.d2an3ge
.1dang2
.da2t
.dat1i
.dag1e
.dea3co2n.
.deaco2n
.de3serv
.1dese
.de3scrip3
.1desc
.descr2
.de3sir
.1desi
.de3sig2n.
.de3signe
.de3signs
.de3sign3i
.de3sta
.de1r2a
.der1r
.der3mal
.d2erm
.1de3ve
.devel3op3i
.dev3ils
.devi2l
.de3vill2e.
.devill4
.de1no2
.dent4
.den3ta
.den4t3ed
.dent3ing
.de1ce
.1dec
.dec3or1o
.de3cid
.de3cis
.de3clin1ab
.de3fea
.de3fe2n
.de3fina
.de3fine
.de3fin1in2
.defin3i2
.def3inite
.def3ini1tio
.de3fi1cie
.deficien3c
.1de1te
.de3lay
.del3la
.de3gr2
.de3man
.de3mea
.de3mo2n.
.dem3oi
.de1pe
.de1pl
.draft3ed
.dr2
.1draf
.drafte2
.drag3o2n.
.1drag
.drag2on
.drag3ons
.dra3mat3ic
.1dram
.dr2ama
.draw3i
.dri2l
.du3a2l.
.dust3a
.dura2
.du3ras
.du2c
.duct3e
.du2ct
.1dul2l
.do3r1in
.do2v
.do3na1tio
.do1in
.doi2
.dol3la
.1doll
.do3mes
.dom3in3a
.1dow1d
.down3er
.doz2es
.1doz
.d4ia
.di3a2s.
.diar3i2
.di2at
.di3a2l.
.di1en1
.di1da
.dis3pu
.1d2isp
.dir3ec
.1dire
.di3v2e.
.1dive
.di3ves
.div3id1ed
.di3o2n.
.di1na
.di2ci
.di3lato2r.
.dila1to
.di3lati
.dill3e
.1di1ge
.dys1
.dy3nam3ic
.1dyn
.dynamical3
.dynam1ic1a
.dy2i
.dwin1
.d1wi
.s2
.sad3dl2e.
.sadd2l
.sa3n2a.
.1sana
.san2c3t
.san3to
.sail3i
.sa2t2e
.sat1u
.sat4ing
.sat1in
.sa3lubrio
.salu1br2
.sal3ini
.salt3e2
.sal4t3in2
.sh2
.shad3ow.
.1shad
.shad3owed
.shad3ows
.shad3owing
.shav3en
.1shav
.shak3en
.1shak
.she3b
.shroud3e
.s2hr
.shi2e
.shi3v2a.
.1shiv
.sh1in3g2
.shift3e2
.sea1s4
.seal3i
.ses1t
.ser3van
.ser3vi3ces
.ser3ie
.ser3iou
.sev3e2r.
.sev3era
.se4v3ered
.se3vere
.sev3ers
.sev3erin
.se2n
.se2b
.se1ca
.se3cur2e.
.se3cured
.se3cur1iti
.sec3to
.se2ct
.set3t2e
.1sett
.se3lah
.se3lec
.sel2e
.self3i
.sell3e
.sell3i
.2se2men
.se1me
.sew1a
.sep3tal
.se1q
.sequen3ces
.se1quenc
.sexu4
.sex1i
.sua2
.1sus1c
.sus1t
.sus1p
.su3r2a.
.su3r1at
.sur2er2
.su2n1d
.suf1
.su3l2a.
.su1la
.1su1l1i
.sul1t
.suppos3ed2
.1sup
.sup1po
.sup1pos
.so1di
.sos1
.sort3e
.sort3in
.sour2c3i
.1sou
.sound3e4
.sou2nd
.1son3i
.so3cia
.sot1t
.sol3ute
.sol3i2ds
.som3at
.1soma
.so3mal
.som3er
.soph3i2s2t.
.soph3i2sts
.scant3e
.scant3i
.schol3ar
.sch2
.1scho
.scru3pu
.scr2
.script3e
.3scrip
.scutch3
.scon2
.sci1e
.sid2i
.sis3te2r.
.sis3ters
.sis3ti
.1si1v
.sincerit3i
.sin1cer
.sincer1i
.sing3er
.s2inge
.sing4l
.sin3g1ly
.si1le
.sil3ve2r.
.sili1
.si3gno
.s4ign3in2
.si4moni3
.si1mon
.sim1i
.sim3pli
.1simp
.stak3er
.stan3ces
.sta3bi
.sta2b
.sta3bles
.stabl2
.sta3ging
.stay3i
.1stay
.ster3o
.ster3i
.stel3l
.stro3ph4
.strip3er
.stud3ie
.1stow3i
.still3i
.sla2n3d
.slat2e
.smil3i
.1sys1
.synthe3s
.1synt
.syn1th
.syl1
.sp2
.spas3mo
.s2pasm
.spar3i
.spa3cing
.s4pac
.sp2acin
.spend3i
.spe2nd
.spe3cia2
.spe3cie2s.
.sprint3e
.sprin2t
.spring3er
.sport3i
.spir3i2t.
.spir3its
.splay3i
.r2
.rad3ish
.radic1al3l
.rad3ic4al
.rav4er
.rav3en1o
.rav3els
.ra4vel
.ran1e
.ran3di
.ra2nd
.rant3
.ran3gi
.ra3b2i.
.ra3bie
.ra3cia2l.
.racia2
.ra3cing
.r2acin
.raid3e
.rai2n2e
.rai3n1er
.rail3i
.raft3ed
.rafte2
.raf3ter
.ra2t
.ra3t2a.
.ra3tio2n.
.ra1tio
.ra3tions
.ral2ly
.rag1g
.ra3m2a.
.r2ama
.ra1mu
.ram2bl2
.ra2mb
.ram1b3ler
.ram1b3li
.ra3jah
.raz2e
.rapa1
.ra3pie
.rapi2
.rap3is
.re3ad1m2
.rea3so
.re3a2ct
.re3a2l.
.4re3al1it
.rehous3es
.re1h
.re1ho
.reel3i
.re1da
.re2dan
.re1de
.red4d3in
.red1di
.re1du4
.re3duci3bi
.red2ly
.re1sh
.res3er3va
.re3servi
.re3sen4
.re3solvabl2
.resol2v1ab
.res3id2e.
.res3ides
.re3sis2
.re3stat
.res4t3ed
.re3str
.resp4ect3e
.re1spe
.respe2ct
.respect4i
.re3spo
.rev3er1e4n
.re3vocab
.re1vi
.re3uses
.ren3der3i
.ren1de4
.re2nd
.re1ch
.re3cur
.re3cor
.re3cov
.rec3on1ci
.recon1c
.rec3og1nit
.rec3og1nize
.recog3niz
.re3cip
.rec3tal
.re2ct
.re1id
.re2i2n.
.re1in
.re2ine
.re1fa
.re3fera
.re1fec3
.re1fi
.re1ta
.retak3i
.re1tak
.re1th
.re1te
.re3test3e
.rete2st
.retest3i
.re1tu
.re3tie
.re3late
.re3la1tio
.re3la2t1in
.4rel4e3vancy
.rel1ev
.re3lia
.re3lie
.re3lin
.rel3ic
.re3lig
.re3gio2n.
.re3gions
.remas3
.re3media2
.re3mem
.re3mov
.re3mis
.re3mit
.re1w
.re1j
.rep3ara
.re3pai2r.
.re3pairs
.re3pen
.rep3rese
.rep3ut1ab
.re3pute
.re1po
.re1pi
.rud2er
.rust3e
.rul1i
.rug1g
.ru1ma1
.ru2me
.rup2p
.roder3
.ro3s2a.
.ros3se
.ros3s1m
.ros3ie
.rosi2
.rosi3er
.ros1t
.ror1
.rov3er
.round3e4
.rou2nd
.root3e
.roo2
.1root
.root3i
.roc2
.rock3et
.ro2ck
.rol2l3in
.ro1ga
.ro3m2a.
.ro3ma3nia
.rom2ani
.roy3a2l.
.1roya
.row1i
.row1l2
.ro2q
.rid3e2r.
.rid1d
.ri3son
.r2iso
.ri3vals
.r2iv
.ri3valle
.riv3e2r.
.riv4en
.rin2
.ring3er
.ring3i
.rib1a
.ri1be
.rick3l
.riff3i
.rm1
.v2
.1vas3c
.vain1
.va3lenc
.valen3cy
.val3ued
.val3ues
.valid3
.vamp3in
.1vam
.ve3d2a.
.vest3e
.3vest3in
.v4er
.1ve3r2a.
.ver3di
.ver4si3f
.vent3e
.3vent3in
.vet1e
.vet1t
.vor1
.vocal3i
.vol3un1
.vol3ut2
.vow1i
.view3er
.1view
.view3i
.vis3u4a2l.
.vi3sio
.vi2si4
.vi4si3bi
.v4isib
.vis3it
.viv3ip1ar1o
.1viv
.vio3lat
.v2iol
.vio3le2t.
.vil2e
.vy2
.k2
.ka3r2a.
.ka1c
.ka3l2i.
.ke1to
.kel1l
.key1i
.kin3et
.kine2
.kind3e2r.
.1ki2nd
.kin3dling
.kind4lin
.kind1li
.u2
.ue1la
.usu4all
.us2i
.ur2a
.1ur3an1i
.ura4n
.ur1e
.ur2ea
.ur1s
.ur1b
.ur1c
.ur4i
.uri1e
.un1am
.un1el
.u2nd2
.un1da
.undat2
.un4der
.unde4
.un1dr2
.und3ie
.un3dis
.un3d1in
.un1s
.un1k
.un1o
.un1ch
.un3cea
.uni3fi
.uni3tie
.un1t2
.un1ten2
.un1g
.uto1
.ut3ters
.utt2e
.ul1ti
.u2l2m
.u2m1b
.up1
.up2p
.ux3
.o2
.od2
.ode1o
.od1d1e
.osh1
.os1s
.os1c
.os1tr
.os1ti
.or4at
.ora3to
.ore1a
.ores1
.or1d
.or2d1u
.or1s
.or2r
.or1ne
.or3bit
.or1c
.or2i
.ori3en4t.
.orie2
.ori3ente
.ori1f
.1ori1g
.or1i1z
.or2gi
.or1ma
.2orm
.or1p
.orph2
.ov3e2n.
.ove2n
.ok2i
.oua1
.oun4
.oo1d
.oo1l4og3ic
.ool4o
.oo1g
.ooz2e
.ooz1i
.on2et
.on1i
.on2to
.obey3i
.observ3an
.1ob1se
.o2bs
.o4bi
.ob1la
.obl2
.ob3lige
.ob3ligi
.oca1
.ocu1
.oi2
.oil1i
.of1fe
.of1fer3i
.of1fer
.off4i
.of3fin
.ot1r
.ot3t2o.
.ol3d2e.
.ol2b
.o2l1m
.og3li
.og2l
.om2a3ni
.omi1c
.om1p
.oz1z
.opac3ity1
.ophe3
.opera2
.op3ing
.opt1e
.op3tic
.optical3
.optic3a
.op1p
.oxi3da
.n2
.na1da
.na1di2
.nas1s4
.nav3i2gab
.naut1ic4
.nau4t
.nan3cy
.nat3ura
.n2atu
.na3tur2e.
.na3tured
.na3tures
.na3tur1i2
.na3z2i.
.neat3
.nea3po
.ne2h
.nest3i
.n2e1ro
.ne3v2a.
.nev3i2l
.n4evi
.neur3o1se
.neur3o1si2
.ne1ce
.neck3i
.1neck
.1ne2c1t
.1ne1go1
.nu2an
.nu1a
.nuan3ces
.nu1e
.nu1bi
.nu1c
.nucle3a
.1nucl
.num1e
.num1ber3i
.nu2mb
.numb3i
.nup1
.nor3mal
.n2orm4
.noos3es
.n4on
.not4e
.no3tic
.nom1i
.no1p
.niv1
.ni1z
.b2
.bas3ke2t.
.1bask
.bas3kets
.bast3er
.1bast
.bark3i
.1bark
.bar3bit
.bar3iu
.ban2d3e2d
.ba2nd
.band3in
.ba1ba
.ba3b2y.
.b2aby
.bat2e
.bal3an
.1bala
.bal3dr2
.ba3l2i.
.ball3in
.b4all
.bha1
.be1h
.b4e3sto
.be1r2a
.ber2i
.ber3in
.berlin3
.ber1l
.be1co
.bet3te2r.
.bett2e
.be3lay
.be3lie
.bel3l2a.
.1bella
.bel4lin
.bel1li
.bell3in2g.
.be3gon
.1beg
.be3gott
.braid3e
.br2
.bre3ch2t.
.bre2c
.brecht2
.broid1er3i
.1broi
.broi2d
.broid1e
.bri3a2nd
.bri3dled
.bridg3es
.brid2ge
.bust3e
.bu3rden
.bur3i
.bur3ger
.bunk4e
.bun3ker
.but4t3ed
.butt2e
.but4t3in
.but1ti
.board3e
.1boa
.bos3ome
.bor3de2r.
.bor3ders
.bound3e4
.bou2nd
.bou1c
.bouch2
.book3i
.1boo
.boo1i
.boot3e
.boot3i
.boil3i
.bol3den
.bo1lu
.bolt3i
.bomb3i
.bo2mb
.bow4e
.bi3a2s.
.bid2i
.b2ish1
.bi1va
.1bina2
.bi3n2at
.bi3net
.bine2
.bin2s
.bit1i
.blast3e
.bl2
.blaz3o
.b1less3
.c2
.ca2sio
.card3ed
.card3ing
.1cardi
.ca3ro2l2e.
.car3bon
.cari3o
.car3ing
.car3pete
.cauca3si
.cau1ca
.cau1cas
.can3a2l.
.can2e
.ca3non1ic3a
.canon3i
.1can1c
.can4t3ed
.can3ter
.cant3ing
.can3ty
.2cath3
.1cat
.ca2ti
.ca1t3io
.cal3e
.1cal1c
.call3in
.camp3er
.camp3ing
.capa4
.ca3pabl2
.cap3ac
.cap3su
.cap3ita
.ca3p2itu
.ch2
.chas3es
.char3it
.chan3ces
.chan3ges
.ch2ange
.chaf3er
.cha2f
.cham3be2r.
.3cham
.cha2mb
.chemic1al3l
.chemic2
.chem1ica
.chew3i
.che2w
.christen3i
.c2hr
.chris1te
.cho3li
.chi1o
.chi3nese
.chill3er
.chil2l
.chill3in
.certain3
.cer1ta
.cer3ti
.cent4
.cen3t3e2r.
.cen3tr2e.
.cen3tres
.cet1e
.celan3
.ce3lia
.cel3lu
.1cell
.cra3nia
.cr2
.cre3a2t
.credu3
.cred3i2t.
.credi2
.cre2dit
.cred3it4e
.cred3its
.cre3sce2nd
.cres1cen
.cresce2
.crust3e
.cru3cia
.crit3i4c1all
.critic3a
.critical3
.cuss1
.custom3a
.1cust
.cus1to
.cur2er2
.cur3ra
